New York, session 2025-2026, S668.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 200 of the state 2 finance law, as amended by section 1 of part U chapter 62 of the laws of 3 2003, is amended as follows: 4 (b) Nothing contained in paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall 5 prevent the state from recovering, by offset or otherwise, any overpay- 6 ment made provided such overpayment was made within the preceding three 7 hundred and sixty-five days (i) for a period when the employee was 8 neither performing services for the state nor on approved leave or (ii) 9 under circumstances where the comptroller reasonably determines that the 10 employee knew, or that a reasonable employee should have known, that the 11 salary paid to [him or her] such employee was in excess of that which 12 [he or she was] they were entitled to receive provided that the amount 13 in question exceeds five hundred dollars and that the affected employee 14 is provided thirty days' notice and an opportunity to respond to such 15 findings prior to seeking such recovery. Such employee may elect to 16 have such recovery limited to no more than ten per centum of the employ- 17 ee's biweekly paycheck; provided, however, the comptroller shall have 18 sole authority to collect any amounts due at the time an employee sepa- 19 rates from service. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02928-01-5